Georgia, session 2025_26, HB360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
income tax imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credits, is amended in Code
Section 48-7-29.8, relating to tax credits for the rehabilitation of historic structures, by
adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(b.1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, any
taxpayer that was preapproved by the commissioner to claim tax credits pursuant to this
Code section for certified structures other than historic homes for tax year 2027 or 2028
shall be authorized to claim the tax credits allowed pursuant to this Code section for a
H. B. 360
- 1 -

HB 360/AP
certified rehabilitation in the authorized tax year or in tax year 2026, provided that such
taxpayer obtains a certificate of occupancy for such certified structureon or before July
1, 2026; provided, however, that any taxpayer that claims tax credits pursuant to this
subsection in tax year 2026 shall only be allowed to claim such credits in an amount:
(A) Not to exceed 90 percent of the amount otherwise allowed pursuant to this Code
section if such credit was preapproved for tax year 2027; or
(B) Not to exceed 85 percent of the amount otherwise allowed pursuant to this Code
section if such credit was preapproved for tax year 2028."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 360
- 2 -